North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-12.3 Health Care Professional Student Loan Repayment Program

43-12.3-01.
Student loan repayment programs — Health care professionals.

The health council shall administer student loan repayment programs, as established by this chapter, for health care professionals willing to provide services in areas of this state that have a defined need for such services.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
1, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”

43-12.3-02.
Application process.

The health council shall develop an application process for public and private entities seeking to fill health care needs and for health care professionals willing to provide necessary services in exchange for benefits under a student loan repayment program.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
2, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”

§
43-12.3-03.
Public and private entities - Selection criteria - Matching funds.

The health council shall establish criteria to be used in selecting public and private entities for participation in a program. The criteria must include:

The number of health care professionals, by specified field, already providing services in the area;

Access to health care services in the area; and

The level of support from the area.

The health council may consult with health care and social service providers, advocacy groups, governmental entities, and others in establishing criteria and evaluating needs based on the criteria.

An entity may not be selected for participation unless it contractually commits to provide matching funds equal to the amount required for a loan repayment program in accordance with section 43-12.3-06.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
3, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”

43-12.3-04.
Public and private entities — Eligibility for participation — Priority.

In selecting public and private entities for participation in a program the health council shall give priority to an entity that:

Meets the selection criteria;

Is located in an area that is statistically underserved; and

Is located at least twenty miles [32.18 kilometers] outside the boundary of a city having more than forty thousand residents.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
4, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”

43-12.3-05.
Health care professionals — Selection criteria.

The health council shall establish criteria to be used in selecting health care professionals for participation in a student loan repayment program. The criteria must include:

The health care professional’s specialty;

The need for the health care professional’s specialty within an area;

The health care professional’s education and experience;

The health care professional’s date of availability and anticipated term of availability; and

The health care professional’s willingness to accept Medicare and Medicaid assignments, if applicable.

In selecting health care professionals for participation in the program the health council shall require that the individual:

Is physically present at and provides services on a full-time basis to an entity that meets the requirements of section 43-12.3-04; or

Is physically present at and provides services on at least a half-time basis to an entity that meets the requirements of section 43-12.3-04;

Provides telehealth services to a second entity that meets the requirements of section 43-12.3-04; and

Verifies that the services provided under paragraphs 1 and 2 are equal to the full-time requirement of subdivision a.

In selecting health care professionals for participation in a program, the health council may consider an individual’s:

Length of residency in this state; and

Attendance at an in-state or an out-of-state institution of higher education.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
5, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”

43-12.3-06.
Student loan repayment program — Contract.

The health council shall enter a contract with a selected health care professional. The health council shall agree to provide student loan repayments on behalf of the selected health care professional subject to the requirements and limitations of this section.

For a physician:

The loan repayment may not exceed twenty thousand dollars per year, and may not exceed one hundred thousand dollars over five years; and

The matching funds must equal fifty percent of the amount required in paragraph 1.

For a clinical psychologist:

The loan repayment may not exceed twelve thousand dollars per year, and may not exceed sixty thousand dollars over five years; and

The matching funds must equal twenty-five percent of the amount required in paragraph 1.

For an advanced practice registered nurse or a physician assistant:

The loan repayment may not exceed four thousand dollars per year, and may not exceed twenty thousand dollars over five years; and

The matching funds must equal ten percent of the amount required in paragraph 1.

For a behavioral health professional:

The loan repayment may not exceed four thousand dollars per year, and may not exceed twenty thousand dollars over five years; and

The matching funds must equal ten percent of the amount required in paragraph 1.

For purposes of this section, a behavioral health professional means an individual who practices in the behavioral health field and is:

A licensed addiction counselor;

A licensed professional counselor;

A licensed social worker;

A registered nurse;

A specialty practice registered nurse; or

A licensed behavior analyst.

All moneys received by the health council under this section are appropriated to the health council on a continuing basis, to be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
6, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 348, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 310, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”

§
43-12.3-07.
Powers of the health council — Continuing appropriation.

1.

The health council may:

a.

Receive and expend any gifts, grants, and other funds for the purposes of this program;

b.

Participate in any federal programs providing for the repayment of student loans on behalf of health care professionals; and

c.

Do all things necessary and proper for the administration of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
7, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 9 of chapter 294, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This Act applies to loan repayment contracts entered into on or after August 1, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-12.2, is governed by chapter 43-12.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015. Any loan repayment contract entered into before August 1, 2015, in accordance with chapter 43-17.2, is governed by chapter 43-17.2, as it existed on July 31, 2015.”